Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.480

Routine traffic enforcement information.

(1) Beginning May 1, 2000, the Washington state patrol shall collect the following information:

(a) The number of individuals stopped for routine traffic enforcement, whether or not a citation or warning was issued;

(b) Identifying characteristics of the individual stopped, including the race or ethnicity, approximate age, and gender;

(c) The nature of the alleged violation that led to the stop;

(d) Whether a search was instituted as a result of the stop; and

(e) Whether an arrest was made, or a written citation issued, as a result of either the stop or the search.

(2) The criminal justice training commission and the Washington state patrol shall compile the information required under subsection (1) of this section and make a report to the legislature no later than December 1, 2000.

[ 2016 c 197 s 3; 2000 c 118 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2000 c 118: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 24, 2000]." [ 2000 c 118 s 4.]